src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
olla: OLLA ;  !!≈ * @CODE@ 
ei+V+Neg: neg ;  !!≈ * @CODE@ 
saađa:saa v1 ;  !!≈ * @CODE@ 
vieđä:vie v1 ;  !!≈ * @CODE@ 
naiđa:nai v1iđa ;  !!≈ * @CODE@
naiđa+V+Inf+Err/Orth:naija v1 ;
voiđa:voi v1iđa ;  !!≈ * @CODE@ 
uiđa:ui v1iđa ;  !!≈ * @CODE@ 
puiđa:pui v1iđa ; !! ...
juođa:juo v1 ;
luođa:luo v1 ;
soiđa:soi v1 ;
suođa:suo v1 ;
tuođa:tuo v1 ;
myyđä:myy v1 ;
jääđä:jää v1 ;
lyöđä:lyö v1 ;
syöđä:syö v1 ;
käyđä:kä v1kayda ;
